Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Housing and  Community Services Department shall contract with the
Housing Development Center, Inc., for the purposes of:
(1) Improving occupancy rates, expediting move-ins, preventing evictions, reducing  resi-
dential turnover and enhancing the well-being of residents in affordable housing  projects by:
(a) Developing and delivering resources for training and capacity-building to improve
property management operations and practices at affordable housing projects; and
(b) Making grants to nonprofit corporations, federally recognized Indian tribes in  this
state, local governments and housing authorities,  in order to support property management
staffing and  operations at specific affordable housing projects that the recipient owns or
operates or where  the recipient provides property management services. The geographic
distribution of grants made under this paragraph must be approximately  in proportion to the
geographic distribution of affordable housing properties.
(2) Providing asset management training to  nonprofit corporations, federally recognized
Indian tribes in this state, local  governments and housing authorities that own or operate
affordable housing projects.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on June 30, 2027.
NOTE: Sections 3 and 4 were deleted by amendment.  Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts:
(1) $2,000,000 to contract for services under section 1 (1) of this 2025 Act.
(2) $1,300,000 to contract for services under section 1 (2) of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
Section 8 of this 2025 Act and ORS  456.250 are added to and made a part of
ORS 456.255 to 456.267.
SECTION 7. ORS 456.255 to 456.267 are added to  and made a part of ORS 456.548 to
456.725.
SECTION 8. The Housing and Community Services Department shall establish and
maintain an affordable housing preservation  program to coordinate affordable housing pres-
ervation efforts and incentivize the  analysis and preservation of affordable housing, including
Enrolled Senate Bill 51 (SB 51-B) Page 1
publicly supported housing and manufactured dwelling parks. Under the  program, the de-
partment shall:
(1) Collect and maintain data from local, state and federal sources on affordable  housing
in this state, including the status of existing affordability restrictions and  rental assistance
contracts at publicly supported housing.
(2) Identify categories of affordable housing at risk of loss, including:
(a) Properties with expiring federal rent assistance contracts;
(b) Properties with expiring affordability restrictions;
(c) Properties with affordability restrictions in physical or financial distress; and
(d) Manufactured dwelling parks at risk of sale or closure.
(3) Take actions to promote housing stability, for residents of:
(a) Affordable housing that is at risk of loss or that has been recently lost; or
(b) Residents of manufactured dwelling parks or marinas at risk of sale or closure.
(4) Establish and  periodically update evaluation criteria for affordable housing preserva-
tion investments.
(5) Identify and  aggregate available sources of funding, including moneys available from
federal and private grants or programs, appropriations by the  Legislative Assembly, existing
funds of the department or financing available from Article XI-Q bond proceeds under ORS
286A.824 or 458.480 to 458.490 or proceeds of other  bonds issued by the State Treasurer, and
use such sources of funding  to implement preservation investments for affordable housing
in accordance with the established evaluation criteria.
(6) Regularly analyze operating  expenses of the existing portfolio of publicly supported
housing that is funded by  the department to inform the department’s underwriting standards
for financing the construction of new  and the preservation of existing publicly supported
housing and to inform forecasts of preservation funding needs.
(7) Regularly update and publish an affordable housing  preservation strategy framework
report that includes information identified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section  and
forecasts the financial need to preserve affordable housing.
(8) Execute the duties of the department under ORS 456.255 to 456.267.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 456.559 is amended to read:
456.559. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall:
(a) Maintain  current housing data and information concerning available programs, status of
funding, programs planned or undertaken which  might conflict with, overlap, duplicate or supersede
other planned  or existing programs and call these to the attention of appropriate state agencies,
governmental bodies and public or private housing sponsors.
(b) Maintain current data  [ from local, state and federal sources concerning publicly supported
housing as that term is defined in ORS 456.250, the status of existing affordability  restrictions as that
term is defined in  ORS 456.250 and rental assistance contracts at publicly supported housing ] on
publicly supported housing as provided under section 8 of this 2025 Act .
(c) Provide to appropriate state agencies, governmental  bodies and public or private housing
sponsors such advisory and educational services as will assist them in the development of  housing
plans and projects.
(d) Subject to  the approval of the Oregon Housing Stability Council, make noninterest bearing
advances, in accordance with ORS 456.710 and the  policies of the department, to qualified nonprofit
sponsors for development costs of housing projects until mortgage funds  are released to repay the
advances as provided in ORS 456.710.
(e) Advise and assist  appropriate state agencies, governmental bodies and public or private
housing sponsors, cities and counties, in all  programs and activities which are designed or might
tend to fulfill the purposes of ORS 456.548 to 456.725 and ORS chapter 458.
(f) Encourage and assist in the planning, development, construction,  rehabilitation and conser-
vation of dwelling units for persons and families of lower income.
Enrolled Senate Bill 51 (SB 51-B) Page 2
(g) Be  the central state department to apply for, receive and distribute, on behalf of appropriate
state agencies, governmental bodies and public or private housing sponsors in  the state, grants,
gifts, contributions, loans, credits or assistance from the federal government or any other source  for
housing programs except when the donor, grantor, or lender of such funds specifically directs some
other agency to administer them. Moneys received under this  section shall be deposited with the
State Treasurer in an account separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the
account shall be credited to the account.
(h) For the purposes of acquiring moneys, credits  or other assistance from any agency or
instrumentality of the United States or from any  public corporation chartered by the United States,
comply with any applicable agreements or restrictions for the receipt  of such assistance and become
a member of any such association or public corporation chartered by the United States.
(i) Assist individuals, appropriate state agencies, governmental bodies  and public or private
housing sponsors through a  program which provides housing information, planning, educational
services and technical assistance.
(j) Comply with the requirements of ORS  443.225 in assisting in the development of any housing
for residential care, training or  treatment for persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities
or mental or emotional disturbances.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in  ORS 456.255 to 456.267, 456.625 (7), 458.315 (3) and 458.480
to 458.490, the department may not itself develop, construct, rehabilitate or conserve  housing units;
and neither the department nor any housing  sponsor, including but not limited to any association,
corporation, cooperative housing authority or urban renewal agency organized to provide  housing
and other facilities under  ORS 456.548 to 456.725, may own, acquire, construct, purchase, lease, op-
erate or maintain utility facilities, including facilities for  the generation of electricity, for the dis-
tribution of gas and electricity, and for the conveyance of telephone and telegraph messages.
(3) In accordance with the  provisions of this section and with the advice of the council, the
department shall establish statewide priorities for housing programs.  State agencies shall coordinate
their housing programs with the department. All state agencies intending to apply for  federal funds
for use in planning, developing or  managing housing, or rendering assistance to governmental bodies
or sponsors or individuals involved therein shall submit a description of the proposed  activity to the
department for review not less than 30 days prior to the  intended date of submission of the appli-
cation to the federal agency. The department  shall determine whether the proposal would result in
a program that would overlap, duplicate or conflict with any other housing program in the  state. If
the department finds overlapping or duplication or conflict, it shall recommend modifications  in the
application. The Oregon  Department of Administrative Services shall consider these recommenda-
tions in making its decision  to approve or disapprove the application. The department shall complete
its review and forward its recommendations within 15 working days after receipt of the notification.
Failure of the department to complete the review within that time shall constitute approval of  the
application by the department.
(4) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department may  participate in dis-
cussions and deliberations of the council. The director may  suggest policies to the council, including
those necessary to stimulate and increase the supply of housing for persons and families  of lower
income.
SECTION 10.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 51 (SB 51-B) Page 3
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 51 (SB 51-B) Page 4